Oklahoma, session 2025, SB776.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law not to be


codified in the Oklahoma Statutes reads as follows:


This act shall be known and may be cited as “Julie’s Law”.


SECTION 2. AMENDATORY 76 O.S. 2021, Section 50.2, is


amended to read as follows:


Section 50.2. As used in the Oklahoma Livestock Activities


Liability Limitation Act:


1. “Engages in a livestock activity” includes training, racing,


showing, riding, or assisting in medical treatment of, or driving


livestock, or engaging in any agritourism activity involving


livestock or on a location where livestock are displayed or raised,

Req. No. 1018 Page 1


and any person assisting a participant, livestock activity sponsor


or livestock professional. The term “engages in a livestock


activity” does not include being a spectator at a livestock


activity, except in cases where the spectator places himself or


herself in immediate proximity to livestock activity;


2. “Agritourism activity” includes, but is not limited to, any


activity carried out on a farm or ranch that allows members of the


general public, for recreational, entertainment, or educational


purposes, to view or enjoy rural activities, including farming,


ranching, historic, cultural, harvest-your-own activities, or


natural activities and attractions. An activity is an agritourism


activity whether or not the participant pays to participate in the


activity;


3. “Equestrian facility” means a facility created and


maintained for the purpose of accommodating horses for equine


activities. Equestrian facility does not mean a facility used for


livestock activities;


3. 4. “Equine activity” means equine training or teaching


activities or both such training or teaching activities at an


equestrian facility;


5. “Livestock” means any cattle, bison, hog, sheep, goat,


equine livestock, including but not limited to animals of the


families bovidae, cervidae and antilocapridae or birds of the ratite


group;

Req. No. 1018 Page 2


4. 6. “Livestock activity” includes but is not limited to:


a. livestock shows, fairs, livestock sales, competitions,


performances, or parades that involve any or all


breeds of livestock and any of the livestock


disciplines, including, but not limited to, rodeos,


auctions, driving, pulling, judging, cutting and


showing,


b. livestock training or teaching activities or both such


training and teaching activities,


c. boarding or pasturing livestock,


d. inspecting or evaluating livestock belonging to


another, whether or not the owner has received some


monetary consideration or other thing of value for the


use of the livestock or is permitting a prospective


purchaser of the livestock to inspect or evaluate the


livestock,


e. drives, rides, trips, hunts or other livestock


activities of any type however informal or impromptu


that are sponsored by a livestock activity sponsor,


f. placing or replacing horseshoes on an equine, or


otherwise preparing livestock for show, and


g. agritourism activities involving the viewing of,


handling of, riding of, showing of, or other


interactive activities with livestock;

Req. No. 1018 Page 3


5. 7. “Livestock activity sponsor” means an individual, group,


club, partnership or corporation, whether or not the sponsor is


operating for profit or nonprofit, which sponsors, organizes, or


provides the facilities for, a livestock activity, including but not


limited to: livestock clubs, 4-H clubs, FFA chapters, school and


college-sponsored classes, programs and activities, therapeutic


riding programs, and operators, instructors, and promoters of


livestock facilities, including, but not limited to, barns, stables,


clubhouses, ponyride strings, fairs and arenas at which the activity


is held;


6. 8. “Livestock professional” means a person engaged for


compensation in:


a. instructing a participant or renting to a participant


livestock for the purpose of engaging in livestock


activity, or


b. renting equipment or tack to a participant;


7. 9. “Inherent risks of livestock activities” means those


dangers or conditions which are an integral part of livestock


activities, including but not limited to:


a. the propensity of livestock to behave in ways that may


result in injury to persons on or around them,


b. the unpredictability of livestock’s reaction to such


things as sounds, sudden movement and unfamiliar


objects, persons or other animals,

Req. No. 1018 Page 4


c. certain hazards such as surface and subsurface


conditions unknown to the livestock activity sponsor,


d. collisions with other livestock or objects, and


e. the potential of tack to become dislodged or move in


ways that may result in injury to persons on or around


livestock activities; and


8. 10. “Participant” means any person, whether amateur or


professional, who engages in a livestock activity, whether or not a


fee is paid to participate in the livestock activity.


SECTION 3. AMENDATORY 76 O.S. 2021, Section 50.3, is


amended to read as follows:


Section 50.3. A. Except as provided in subsection B of this


section, a livestock activity sponsor, a participant or a livestock


professional acting in good faith and pursuant to the standards of


the livestock industry shall not be liable for injuries to any


person engaged in livestock activities when such injuries result


from the inherent risks of livestock activities.


B. 1. The provisions of the Oklahoma Livestock Activities


Liability Limitation Act shall not apply to employees of the sponsor


or livestock professional in the performance of their duties who are


covered by or subject to the provisions of the workers’ compensation


laws of Title 85 of the Oklahoma Statutes.


2. Nothing in subsection A of this section shall prevent or


limit the liability of a livestock activity sponsor, a participant

Req. No. 1018 Page 5


or a livestock professional, if the livestock activity sponsor, a


participant or livestock professional:


a. commits an act or omission that constitutes willful or


wanton disregard for the safety of any person engaged


in livestock activities, and that act or omission


caused the injury,


b. intentionally injures a person engaged in livestock


activities,


c. provided the equipment or tack, which was faulty, and


such equipment or tack was faulty to the extent that


it did cause the injury. The provisions of this


subparagraph shall not apply to livestock activities


sponsored by youth organizations when youth


participants share equipment or tack between


themselves,


d. provided the livestock and failed to make a reasonable


effort to determine the ability of the participant to


manage the particular livestock based upon the


participant’s representations of such participant’s


ability. Provided, however, a participant in a


livestock show, livestock sale, or rodeo shall be


presumed to be competent in the handling of livestock


if an entry form is required for the activity and


signed by the participant, or

Req. No. 1018 Page 6


e. owns, leases, rents or otherwise is in lawful


possession and control of the land or facilities upon


which the participant sustained injuries because of a


dangerous condition which was known to the livestock


activity sponsor, livestock professional or person and


not made known to the participant.


3. Nothing in subsection A of this section shall prevent or


limit the liability of a livestock activity sponsor, a participant


or a livestock professional:


a. under liability provisions as set forth in the


products liability laws, or


b. for livestock activities which result in the death of


any person engaged in livestock activities from the


inherent risks of livestock activities.


4. Nothing in subsection A of this section shall prevent or


limit the liability of an individual owning, leasing, renting, or


otherwise in lawful possession of an equestrian facility who fails


to follow the provisions of Section 3 of this act.


C. A sponsor shall not be held vicariously liable for the acts


or omission of a participant or a livestock professional.


SECTION 4. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 50.5 of Title 76, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:



Req. No. 1018 Page 7


A. It shall be unlawful for a person less than eighteen (18)


years of age to engage in equine activities at an equestrian


facility in this state without wearing protective headgear secured


by a harness, which passed ASTM International and the Safety


Equipment Institute standards for equine activity use.


B. The provisions of this section may be waived pursuant to


Section 50.4 of Title 76 of the Oklahoma Statutes.


SECTION 5. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.




60-1-1018 MR 1/19/2025 5:43:06 AM





























Req. No. 1018 Page 8